District of Columbia statutes.
3-1325

Designation of individual responsible for proper utilization of receipts; financial responsibility bond; license fees.

Each person, firm, partnership, association, organization, or corporation conducting bingo and raffles shall designate an individual as responsible for the proper utilization of gross receipts in a manner not in violation of or contrary to the rules and regulations of the Board and to insure that utilization of such gross receipts is in accordance with and sanctioned by such rules and regulations. A financial responsibility bond with sufficient sureties shall be given to the Board to insure the faithful discharge of the duties of the responsible member for the proper utilization of gross receipts and payment of all required fees and taxes. Said financial responsibility bond and said fees shall be determined by the Board. Each person, firm, partnership, association, organization, or corporation shall pay to the Board a license fee for each occasion proposed for the conduct of bingo and raffles; an annual license fee for each person designated to conduct bingo and raffles on each proposed occasion; and an annual license fee for each member responsible for the proper utilization of gross receipts.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2525.

Prior Codifications